Utah statutes.
58-37a-3.   "Drug paraphernalia" defined.
As used in this chapter, "drug paraphernalia" means any equipment, product, or
material used, or intended for use, to plant, propagate, cultivate, grow,
harvest, manufacture, compound, convert, produce, process, prepare, test,
analyze, package, repackage, store, contain, conceal, inject, ingest, inhale,
or to otherwise introduce a controlled substance into the human body in
violation of Title 58, Chapter 37, Utah Controlled Substances Act, and
includes, but is not limited to:
(1)  kits used, or intended for use, in planting, propagating, cultivating,
growing, or harvesting any species of plant which is a controlled substance or
from which a controlled substance can be derived;
(2)  kits used, or intended for use, in manufacturing, compounding,
converting, producing, processing, or preparing a controlled substance;
(3)  isomerization devices used, or intended for use, to increase the potency
of any species of plant which is a controlled substance;
(4)  testing equipment used, or intended for use, to identify or to analyze
the strength, effectiveness, or purity of a controlled substance;
(5)  scales and balances used, or intended for use, in weighing or measuring a
controlled substance;
(6)  diluents and adulterants, such as quinine hydrochloride, mannitol,
mannited, dextrose and lactose, used, or intended for use to cut a controlled
substance;
(7)  separation gins and sifters used, or intended for use to remove twigs,
seeds, or other impurities from marihuana;
(8)  blenders, bowls, containers, spoons and mixing devices used, or intended
for use to compound a controlled substance;
(9)  capsules, balloons, envelopes, and other containers used, or intended for
use to package small quantities of a controlled substance;
(10)  containers and other objects used, or intended for use to store or
conceal a controlled substance;
(11)  hypodermic syringes, needles, and other objects used, or intended for
use to parenterally inject a controlled substance into the human body; and
(12)  objects used, or intended for use to ingest, inhale, or otherwise
introduce a controlled substance into the human body, including but not
limited to:
(a)  metal, wooden, acrylic, glass, stone, plastic, or ceramic pipes with or
without screens, permanent screens, hashish heads, or punctured metal bowls;
(b)  water pipes;
(c)  carburetion tubes and devices;
(d)  smoking and carburetion masks;
(e)  roach clips: meaning objects used to hold burning material, such as a
marihuana cigarette, that has become too small or too short to be held in the
hand;
(f)  miniature cocaine spoons and cocaine vials;
(g)  chamber pipes;
(h)  carburetor pipes;
(i)  electric pipes;
(j)  air-driven pipes;
(k)  chillums;
(l)  bongs; and
(m)  ice pipes or chillers.
